Hawaii statutes.
§302A-616 Conditions of sabbatical leave of
absence. (a) A teacher or educational officer on sabbatical leave shall
devote one-half of the teacher's or educational officer's total leave to
professional educational course work, research, or other professional activity
approved by the department. The department shall establish guidelines and
criteria of professional educational course work, research, or other
professional activity. Before granting a sabbatical leave to a teacher or
educational officer, the department and the teacher or educational officer
shall enter into a contract, which shall provide for the following:

(1) That the teacher or educational officer agrees to
return to serve in the department, the University of Hawaii, or any community college
for a period of not less than two years within one year after termination of
the teacher's or educational officer's sabbatical leave;

(2) That upon failure of the teacher or educational
officer to comply with paragraph (1), the teacher or educational officer agrees
to refund to the department all moneys received while on sabbatical leave;

(3) That upon failure of the teacher or educational
officer to comply with paragraph (2), the teacher or educational officer agrees
to pay for all costs incurred by the department in enforcing paragraph (2);

(4) That upon failure to comply with paragraph (1),
the educational officer's Hawaii teaching certificate shall be canceled by the
department; and

(5) Any other provisions deemed necessary by the
department to be included in the contract.

(b) Beginning with the 2002-2003 school year,
this section shall be interpreted as though the term "certificate"
read "license", as the latter terms are used in subpart D, and as
circumstances require. [L 1996, c 89, pt of §2; am L 2001, c 312, §§8, 13]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next